Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 33
NORMAL SCHOOLS — FEDERAL EDUCATIONAL AID

Section.

33-3301. Normal school permanent endowment fund.

There is established in the state treasury the normal school permanent endowment fund. This fund is perpetually appropriated for the beneficiaries of the endowment. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund principal shall forever remain intact. The fund shall be a permanent fund and shall consist of the following:

Proceeds of the sale of any of the lands granted to the state of Idaho by the United States government under the provisions of the Idaho Admission Bill, 26 Stat. L. 215, ch. 656, known as normal school endowment lands, and those granted in lieu of such;

Proceeds of royalties arising from the extraction of minerals on normal endowment school lands owned by the state; and

Moneys allocated from the normal school earnings reserve fund.

Provided however, that proceeds from the sale of normal school endowment lands may be first deposited into the land bank fund established in section 58-133, Idaho Code, to be used to acquire other lands within the state for the benefit of endowment beneficiaries. If the land sale proceeds are not used to acquire other lands in accordance with section 58-133, Idaho Code, the proceeds shall be deposited into the normal school permanent endowment fund along with any earnings on the proceeds.

Earnings from the investment of the normal school permanent endowment fund shall be distributed according to the provisions of section 57-723A, Idaho Code.

33-3301A. Normal school earnings reserve fund.

There is established in the state treasury the normal school earnings reserve fund. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund shall consist of the following:

All earnings of the normal school permanent endowment fund;

Proceeds of the sale of timber growing on normal school endowment lands;

Proceeds of leases of normal school endowment lands;

Proceeds of interest upon deferred payments on normal school endowment lands or timber on those lands; and

All other proceeds received from the use of normal school endowment lands and not otherwise designated for deposit in the normal school permanent endowment fund.

Moneys shall be distributed out of the normal school earnings reserve fund only to support the beneficiaries of the normal school endowment, including distributions by the state board of land commissioners to the normal school permanent endowment fund and the normal school income fund; provided, that funds shall not be appropriated by the legislature from the normal school earnings reserve fund except to pay for administrative costs incurred managing the assets of the normal school endowment including, but not limited to, real property and monetary assets.

33-3301B. Normal school income fund.

There is established in the state treasury the normal school income fund. The fund shall consist of all moneys distributed from the normal school earnings reserve fund and from other sources as the legislature deems appropriate. Moneys in the normal school income fund shall be used for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the endowment and distributed to current beneficiaries of the normal school endowment pursuant to legislative appropriation. However, not more than fifty percent (50%) of earnings of the normal school income fund shall ever be appropriated for the support and maintenance of either Lewis-Clark State College or the department of education at Idaho State University.

33-3302. Appropriation for Lewis-Clark State College.

Fifty percent (50%) of all moneys that now are in or which may hereafter accrue to the normal school income fund are perpetually appropriated and set apart for the support and maintenance of the Lewis-Clark State College, the same to be available for such purpose immediately upon their being credited to the fund.

33-3303. Appropriation for support and maintenance of an Albion Normal School Field Institute.

Subject to legislative approval by adoption of a concurrent resolution in both houses approving a department of parks and recreation memorandum of understanding negotiated between the Idaho department of parks and recreation and the city of Albion and other public or private agencies interested in cooperative management of an Albion Normal School Field Institute within an Albion State Normal School state park complex, the appropriately designated state agency shall receive three percent (3%) of all moneys that are now in or which may hereafter accrue to the normal school income fund, the same to be set apart for support and maintenance of the Albion Normal School Field Institute. The memorandum of understanding negotiated by the Idaho department of parks and recreation and the city of Albion and other public or private agencies interested in cooperative management of an Albion Normal School Field Institute within an Albion State Normal School state park complex shall be negotiated in accordance with guidelines established in the Idaho department of parks and recreation’s Albion Campus General Development Plan.

33-3304. Appropriation for the department of education at Idaho State University.

Fifty percent (50%) of all the moneys that now are in or which may hereafter accrue to the normal school income fund are hereby appropriated and set apart for the support and maintenance of the department of education at Idaho State University, the same to be available for such purpose immediately upon their being credited to the fund. Should the legislature, by adoption of a concurrent resolution in both houses, approve a memorandum of understanding negotiated by the Idaho department of parks and recreation between the city of Albion and other public or private agencies interested in cooperative management of an Albion Normal School Field Institute within an Albion State Normal School state park complex, the percentage share for the department of education at Idaho State University shall be reduced from fifty percent (50%) to forty-seven percent (47%). In the event that the memorandum of understanding is not approved, section 33-3305, Idaho Code, shall apply.

33-3305. Appropriation for asbestos removal and building demolition of all Albion state normal school buildings not of practical value to the city of Albion.

In the event that the memorandum of understanding of section 33-3303, Idaho Code, as negotiated by the Idaho department of parks and recreation between the city of Albion and other public and private agencies interested in cooperative management of an Albion Normal School Field Institute that is within an Albion State Normal School state park complex is not approved by the legislature, separate legislative appropriation by joint finance appropriations committee action shall be given due consideration by the legislature for the express purpose of asbestos removal and building demolition of all campus buildings not of practical value to the city of Albion.